District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Open Meetings Clarification Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Open Meetings Act, effective March 31, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-350; D.C.
Official Code § 2-571 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 404 (D.C. Official Code § 2-574) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1)(A) “Meeting” means any gathering of a quorum of the members of a public
body, including hearings and roundtables, whether formal or informal, regular, special, or
emergency, at which the members consider, conduct, or advise on public business, including
gathering information, taking testimony, discussing, deliberating, recommending, and voting,
regardless whether held in person, by telephone, electronically, or by other means of
communication.
“(B) The term “meeting” shall not include:
“(i) A chance or social gathering; provided, that it is not held to
avoid the provisions of this paragraph; or
“(ii) A press conference.
“(C) For the purposes of the Council of the District of Columbia
(“Council”), the term “meeting” means a regular or additional legislative meeting, and
committee meetings where votes are taken.”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
inserting a semicolon in its place;
(B) Subparagraph (F) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (G) is added to read as follows:
“(G) The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.”.
(b) Section 405 (D.C. Official Code § 2-575) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “televised.” and
inserting the phrase "televised; or” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) The public body takes steps reasonably calculated to allow the public to view
or hear the meeting while the meeting is taking place, or, if doing so is not technologically
feasible, as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable.”.
(2) Subsection (b)(8) is amended to read as follows:
“(8) To discuss and take action regarding specific methods and procedures to
protect the public or a public body from existing or potential terrorist activity or other substantial
dangers to public health and safety, or to receive briefings by staff members, legal counsel, law
enforcement officials, or emergency service officials concerning these methods and procedures;
provided, that disclosure could endanger the public or the public body;”.
(3) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
“(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this act, the Council may adopt its own rules to
ensure the District’s open meetings policy, as established in section 402, is met with respect to
gatherings of councilmembers; provided, that unless the Council adopts rules pursuant to this
subsection, this title shall apply to the Council.”
(4) A new subsection (h) is added to read as follows:
“(h) This title shall not apply to a meeting between members of the Council and the
Mayor; provided, that no official action is decided at the meeting.”.
(c) Section 406 (D.C. Official Code § 2-576) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Except for
emergency meetings, a public body shall provide” and inserting the phrase “A public body shall
attempt to provide” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase ”Notwithstanding the
notice requirement of paragraph (2) of this subsection, except” and inserting the word “Except”
in its place.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “urgent matter,” and
inserting the phrase “urgent matter, and notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (3) of this
subsection,” in its place.
(3) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) For the purposes of the Council, the appropriate officer of the Council shall
provide notice pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection when a gathering of a quorum of the
Council that is not otherwise required by law or rule to be noticed in advance took place, at
which Councilmembers considered public business, regardless whether the gathering was held in
person, by telephone, or by video conference, and the gathering of Councilmembers was not
noticed in advance.
“(2) The convener of a gathering of Councilmembers that meets the notice
requirement in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall notify the appropriate Council officer within
24 business hours after the gathering and provide the information required by paragraph (3)(B)
of this subsection.
“(3) Notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
“(A) Be posted by the Council on the website of the Council no later than
24 business hours after receiving notice that a gathering of Councilmembers took place; and
“(B) Include the date and approximate time the gathering of
Councilmembers took place, and the topic of the gathering.”.
(d) Section 407 (D.C. Official Code § 2-577) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the public’s right to
attend the meeting, or steps are taken that are reasonably calculated to allow the public to view or
hear the meeting while the meeting is taking place, or if doing so is not technologically feasible,
as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable;”.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “taken by roll call”
and inserting the word “recorded” in its place.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “E-mail exchanges” and
inserting the phrase “E-mail exchanges and text messages” in its place.
(e) Section 409(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-579(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“Council meetings” and inserting the phrase “meetings and gatherings of councilmembers” in its
place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This act shall take effect following approval of the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4